Wisconsin, session 2025, SB589.
do enact as follows:SB589,11Section 1. 253.078 of the statutes is created to read:SB589,2,32253.078 Right to contraception. (1) Short title. This section shall be 3known as the “Right to Contraception Act.”SB589,2,44(2) Definitions. In this section:SB589,2,75(a) “Contraception” means an action taken to prevent pregnancy, including 6the use of contraceptives or fertility-awareness-based methods and sterilization 7procedures.SB589,2,148(b) “Contraceptive” means any drug, device, or biological product intended for 9use in the prevention of pregnancy, whether specifically intended to prevent 10pregnancy or for other health needs, that is legally marketed under the federal 11Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, such as oral contraceptives, long-acting reversible 12contraceptives, emergency contraceptives, internal and external condoms, 13injectables, vaginal barrier methods, transdermal patches, and vaginal rings, or 14other contraceptives.SB589,2,1515(c) “Health care provider” has the meaning given in s. 146.81 (1).SB589,3,11(d) “Political subdivision” means a city, village, town, or county.SB589,3,52(3) Permitted services. (a) A person has a statutory right under this 3section to obtain contraceptives and to engage in contraception, and a health care 4provider has a corresponding right to provide contraceptives, contraception, and 5contraception-related information.SB589,3,76(b) The statutory rights specified in par. (a) may not be limited or otherwise 7infringed through any limitation or requirement that does all of the following:SB589,3,1281. Expressly, effectively, implicitly, or as implemented singles out the 9provision of contraceptives, contraception, or contraception-related information; 10health care providers who provide contraceptives, contraception, or contraception-11related information; or facilities in which contraceptives, contraception, or 12contraception-related information is provided.SB589,3,14132. Impedes access to contraceptives, contraception, or contraception-related 14information.SB589,3,1715(c) To defend against a claim that a limitation or requirement violates a 16health care provider’s or patient’s statutory rights under par. (b), a party must 17establish, by clear and convincing evidence, all of the following:SB589,3,19181. The limitation or requirement significantly advances the safety of 19contraceptives, contraception, and contraception-related information.SB589,3,22202. The safety of contraceptives, contraception, and contraception-related 21information or the health of patients cannot be advanced by a less restrictive 22alternative measure or action.SB589,4,323(4) Applicability. (a) Neither the state nor any political subdivision of the 1state may administer, implement, or enforce any law, rule, regulation, standard, or 2other provision having the force and effect of law in a manner that does any of the 3following:SB589,4,641. Prohibits or restricts the sale, provision, or use of any contraceptives that 5have been approved by the federal food and drug administration for contraceptive 6purposes.SB589,4,972. Prohibits or restricts any person from aiding another person in obtaining 8any contraceptives approved by the federal food and drug administration or 9contraceptive methods.SB589,4,13103. Exempts any contraceptives approved by the federal food and drug 11administration from any other generally applicable law in a way that would make it 12more difficult to sell, provide, obtain, or use those contraceptives or contraceptive 13methods.SB589,4,1714(b) This section does not supersede or otherwise affect any provision relating 15to coverage under group health plans or group or individual health insurance 16coverage and may not be construed as requiring the provision of specific benefits 17under these plans or coverage.SB589,4,2018(c) An individual or entity who is subject to a limitation or requirement that 19violates this section may raise this section as a defense to any cause of action 20against the individual or entity.SB589,4,2221(5) Construction. (a) This section shall be liberally construed to effectuate 22its purposes.SB589,4,2323(b) Nothing in this section may be construed to do any of the following:SB589,5,311. Authorize any government to interfere with a health care provider’s ability 2to provide contraceptives or contraception-related information or a person’s ability 3to obtain contraceptives or to engage in contraception.SB589,5,542. Permit or sanction the conduct of any sterilization procedure without the 5patient’s voluntary and informed consent.SB589,5,116(6) Enforcement. (a) The attorney general may commence a civil action on 7behalf of the state against any person that violates or enforces a limitation or 8requirement that violates this section. Notwithstanding s. 165.08 (1), in any civil 9action brought under this paragraph, the attorney general may compromise and 10settle the action as the attorney general determines to be in the best interest of the 11state.SB589,5,1512(b) Any individual or entity, including any health care provider or patient, 13adversely affected by an alleged violation of this section may commence a civil 14action against any person that violates or implements or enforces a limitation or 15requirement that violates this section.SB589,5,1816(c) A health care provider may commence an action for relief on its own behalf, 17on behalf of the provider’s staff, and on behalf of the provider’s patients who are or 18may be adversely affected by an alleged violation of this section.SB589,5,2219(d) If a court finds that there has been a violation of this section, the court 20shall hold unlawful and set aside the limitation or requirement. In any action 21under this section, the court may award appropriate equitable relief, including 22temporary, preliminary, or permanent injunctive relief.SB589,6,423(e) Notwithstanding the limitation under s. 814.04, in any action under this 1section, the court shall award to any prevailing plaintiff costs and reasonable 2attorney fees. Unless a court determines an action is frivolous, the court may not 3hold a plaintiff liable to a defendant for costs and attorney fees in an action under 4this section.SB589,25Section 2. Nonstatutory provisions.SB589,6,66(1) Legislative findings. The legislature finds all of the following:SB589,6,97(a) The right to contraception is a fundamental right, central to a person’s 8privacy, health, well-being, dignity, liberty, equality, and ability to participate in the 9social and economic life of the state.SB589,6,1110(b) The U.S. Supreme Court has repeatedly recognized the constitutional 11right to contraception.SB589,6,1312(c) In Griswold v. Connecticut, 381 U.S. 479 (1965), the U.S. Supreme Court 13first recognized the constitutional right for married people to use contraceptives.SB589,6,1614(d) In Eisenstadt v. Baird, 405 U.S. 438 (1972), the U.S. Supreme Court 15confirmed the constitutional right of all people to legally access contraceptives 16regardless of marital status.SB589,6,1817(e) In Carey v. Population Services International, 431 U.S. 678 (1977), the 18U.S. Supreme Court affirmed the constitutional right to contraceptives for minors.SB589,7,519(f) The right to contraceptives is protected by the Wisconsin Constitution. See 20article I, section 1, of the Wisconsin Constitution; Haase v. Sawicki, 20 Wis. 2d 308, 21310 n.2 (1963) (finding that article I, section 1, of the Wisconsin Constitution is 22substantially the equivalent of the Due Process Clause and the Equal Protection 23Clause of the Fourteenth Amendment); Griswold v. Connecticut, 381 U.S. 479, 484-2486 (1965) (finding that a prohibition on the use of contraceptives violates the right 1to privacy created by several fundamental constitutional guarantees under the U.S. 2Constitution); and Lawrence v. Texas, 539 U.S. 558, 573-74 (2003) (finding that the 3Due Process Clause of the Fourteenth Amendment protects personal decisions 4relating to marriage, procreation, contraception, family relationships, child rearing, 5and education).SB589,7,96(g) The right to contraception has been repeatedly recognized internationally 7as a human right. The United Nations Population Fund has published several 8reports outlining family planning as a basic human right that advances women’s 9health, economic empowerment, and equality.SB589,7,1210(h) Access to contraceptives is internationally recognized by the World Health 11Organization as advancing other human rights such as the right to life, liberty, 12expression, health, work, and education.SB589,7,1613(i) Contraception is safe, essential health care, and access to contraceptive 14products and services is central to people’s ability to participate equally in economic 15and social life. Contraception allows people to make decisions about their families 16and their lives.SB589,7,2017(j) Contraception is key to sexual and reproductive health. Contraception is 18critical to preventing unintended pregnancy, and many contraceptives are highly 19effective in preventing and treating a wide array of often severe medical conditions 20and decrease the risk of certain cancers.SB589,7,2321(k) Family planning improves health outcomes for women, their families, and 22their communities and reduces rates of maternal and infant mortality and 23morbidity.SB589,8,41(L) The United States has a long history of reproductive coercion, including 2the childbearing forced upon enslaved women, as well as the forced sterilization of 3Black women, Puerto Rican women, indigenous women, immigrant women, and 4disabled women, and reproductive coercion continues to occur.SB589,8,135(m) The right to make personal decisions about contraceptive use is important 6for all people, and is especially critical for historically marginalized groups, 7including Black, indigenous, and other people of color; immigrants; lesbian, gay, 8bisexual, transgender, and queer people; people with disabilities; people with low 9incomes; and people living in rural and underserved areas. Many people who are 10part of these marginalized groups already face barriers, exacerbated by social, 11political, economic, and environmental inequities, to comprehensive health care, 12including reproductive health care, that reduce their ability to make decisions 13about their health, families, and lives.SB589,8,1614(n) Policies governing pharmaceutical and insurance policies affect the 15accessibility of contraceptives and the settings in which contraception services are 16delivered. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb589 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb589 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB589 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB589 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB589: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting